Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-535
Waterworks; construction and maintenance; acquisition of land beyond corporate limits; procedure.

For the purpose of erecting, constructing, locating, maintaining, or supplying such waterworks, mains, portion, or extension of any system of waterworks or water supply, any such city or village may go beyond its territorial limits and may take, hold, acquire rights, property, and real estate by purchase or otherwise, and may for this purpose, take, hold, and condemn any and all necessary property. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XV, p. 178;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XV, p. 169;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XV, p. 297;

Laws 1893, c. 8, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1903, c. 21, § 1, p. 251;

Laws 1905, c. 30, § 1, p. 257;

Laws 1907, c. 17, § 1, p. 128;

R.S.1913, § 5119;

Laws 1917, c. 103, § 1, p. 272;

Laws 1919, c. 48, § 1, p. 138;

Laws 1919, c. 52, § 1, p. 152;

Laws 1919, c. 46, § 2, p. 132;

C.S.1922, § 4292;

Laws 1925, c. 41, § 1, p. 159;

C.S.1929, § 17-441;

Laws 1935, c. 34, § 1, p. 143;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-441;

R.S.1943, § 17-535;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 57, p. 473.

A village is limited to taking only such property as is presently necessary for the purposes described in section 17-531. Engelhaupt v. Village of Butte, 248 Neb. 827, 539 N.W.2d 430 (1995).